Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0648.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 337. (1) The adjutant general may authorize a person engaged in the production of a film in this state to use without charge property owned by or under the control of the department of military and veterans affairs for the purpose of producing a film under terms and conditions established by the adjutant general. The economic and other benefits to this state of film production located in this state shall be deemed are considered to be the value received by this state in exchange for the use of property under this section. (2) The adjutant general shall not authorize the use of property owned by or under the control of the department of military and veterans affairs for the production of a film that includes obscene matter or an obscene performance or for a production for which records are required to be maintained with respect to any performer under 18 USC 2257. (3) The department of military and veterans affairs shall cooperate with the Michigan film office in providing the office with information about potential film locations owned by or under the control of the department of military and veterans affairs and the use of property owned by or under the control of the department of military and veterans affairs. (3) (4) As used in this section: (a) "Film" means single media or multimedia entertainment content for distribution or exhibition to the general public by any means and media in any digital media format, film, or videotape, including, but not limited to, a motion picture, a documentary, a television series, a television miniseries, a television special, interstitial television programming, long-form television, interactive television, music videos, interactive games, video games, commercials, internet programming, an internet video, a sound recording, a video, digital animation, or an interactive website. (b) "Michigan film office" means the office created under chapter 2A of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2029 to 125.2029g. (b) (c) "Obscene matter or an obscene performance" means matter described in 1984 PA 343, MCL 752.361 to 752.374. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.